hr-HR: Tema pečata: Životinje; Arhitektura; Umjetnost; Astronomija; Avijacija; Ptice; Leptiri; Automobili; Mačke; Šah; Kovanice; Stripovi; Ples; Dinosauri; Psi; Istraživanje; Bajka; Poznate osobe; Moda; Zastave; Cvjetni; Folklor; Hrana i piće; Voće; Geologija; Povijest; Praznici; Konji; Autohtona umjetnost; Insekti; Znamenitosti; Književnost; Život u moru; Filmovi i TV; Glazba; Mitologija; Nacionalni parkovi; Priroda; Olimpijske igre; Religija; Gmazovi; Znanost; Svemir; Sport; Tehnologija; Kazalište; Vlakovi; Prijevoz; Podvodni život; Vrijeme; Divlje životinje; Svjetska baština; Ostalo
en: Stamp theme: Animals; Architecture; Art; Astronomy; Aviation; Birds; Butterflies; Cars; Cats; Chess; Coins; Comics; Dance; Dinosaurs; Dogs; Exploration; Fairytale; Famous people; Fashion; Flags; Floral; Folklore; Food & drinks; Fruits; Geology; History; Holidays; Horses; Indigenous art; Insects; Landmarks; Literature; Marine life; Movies & TV; Music; Mythology; National parks; Nature; Olympics; Religion; Reptiles; Science; Space; Sports; Technology; Theater; Trains; Transportation; Underwater life; Weather; Wildlife; World heritage sites; Other
pt-BR: Tema de carimbo: Animais; Arquitetura; Arte; Astronomia; Aviação; Pássaros; Borboletas; Carros; Gatos; Xadrez; Moedas; Histórias em quadrinhos; Dança; Dinossauros; Cães; Exploração; Conto de fadas; Pessoas famosas; Moda; Bandeiras; Floral; Folclore; Comidas e bebidas; Frutas; Geologia; História; Feriados; Cavalos; Arte indígena; Insetos; Marcos; Literatura; Vida marinha; Filmes e TV; Música; Mitologia; Parques nacionais; Natureza; Olimpíadas; Religião; Répteis; Ciência; Espaço; Esportes; Tecnologia; Teatro; Trens; Transporte; Vida subaquática; Clima; Animais selvagens; Património Mundial; Outro
cs: Motiv pro razítka: Zvířata; Architektura; Umění; Astronomie; Letectví; Ptáci; Motýli; Automobily; Kočky; Šachy; Mince; Komiks; Tanec; Dinosauři; Psi; Průzkum; Pohádka; Slavní lidé; Móda; Vlajky; Květinový; Folklór; Jídlo a pití; Ovoce; Geologie; Historie; Svátky; Koně; Umění původních obyvatel; Hmyz; Pamětihodnosti; Literatura; Mořský život; Filmy a TV; Hudba; Mytologie; Národní parky; Příroda; Olympiády; Náboženství; Plazi; Věda; Vesmír; Sporty; Technologie; Divadlo; Vlaky; Přeprava; Podmořský život; Počasí; Divoká příroda; Památky světového kulturního dědictví; Jiné
fi: Leiman teema: Eläimet; Arkkitehtuuri; Taide; Tähtitiede; Ilmailu; Linnut; Perhoset; Autot; Kissat; Shakki; Kolikot; Sarjakuvat; Tanssi; Dinosaurukset; Koirat; Tutkimus; Satu; Kuuluisat ihmiset; Muoti; Liput; Kukikas; Kansanperinne; Ruoka ja juomat; Hedelmät; Geologia; Historia; Lomailu; Hevoset; Alkuperäiskansojen taide; Hyönteiset; Maamerkit; Kirjallisuus; Merenelämä; Elokuvat ja TV; Musiikki; Mytologia; Kansallispuistot; Luonto; Olympialaiset; Uskonto; Matelijat; Tiede; Avaruus; Urheilu; Teknologia; Teatteri; Junat; Kuljetus; Vedenalainen elämä; Sää; Villieläimet; Maailmanperintökohteet; Muu
da: Frimærketema: Dyr; Arkitektur; Kunst; Astronomi; Luftfart; Fugle; Sommerfugle; Biler; Katte; Skak; Mønter; Tegneserier; Dans; Dinosaurer; Hunde; Udforskning; Eventyr; Berømte mennesker; Mode; Flag; Blomster; Folklore; Mad og drikkevarer; Frugter; Geologi; Historie; Jul; Heste; Indfødt kunst; Insekter; Landemærker; Litteratur; Marinelivet; Film & TV; Musik; Mytologi; Nationalparker; Natur; OL; Religion; Krybdyr; Videnskab; Rummet; Sport; Teknologi; Teater; Tog; Transport; Livet under vandet; Vejret; Dyreliv; Verdensarvssteder; Andet
sv: Stämpeltema: Djur; Arkitektur; Konst; Astronomi; Flygning; Fåglar; Fjärilar; Bilar; Katter; Schack; Mynt; Serier; Dans; Dinosaurier; Hundar; Utforskning; Saga; Kända personer; Mode; Flaggor; Blommig; Folklore; Mat & drycker; Frukter; Geologi; Historia; Högtider; Hästar; Ursprungskonst; Insekter; Landmärken; Litteratur; Marint liv; Filmer och TV; Musik; Mytologi; Nationalparker; Natur; OS; Religion; Reptiler; Vetenskap; Rymden; Sporter; Teknologi; Teater; Tåg; Transport; Undervattensliv; Väder; Vilda djur och växter; Världsarv; Annat
ro-RO: Tematica timbrelor: Animale; Arhitectură; Artă; Astronomie; Aviație; Păsări; Fluturi; Mașini; Pisici; Șah; Monede; Benzi desenate; Dans; Dinozauri; Câini; Explorare; Basm; Oameni celebri; Modă; Steaguri; Floral; Folclor; Alimente și băuturi; Fructe; Geologie; Istorie; Sărbători; Cai; Arta indigenă; Insecte; Repere; Literatură; Viața marină; Filme și televiziune; Muzică; Mitologie; Parcuri naționale; Natură; Olimpiadă; Religie; Reptile; Știință; Spațiu; Sport; Tehnologie; Teatru; Trenuri; Transport; Viață subacvatică; Vreme; Faună sălbatică; Situri de patrimoniu mondial; Altele
zh-TW: 郵票主題: 動物; 建築; 藝術; 天文學; 航空; 鳥類; 蝴蝶; 車子; 貓; 西洋棋; 硬幣; 漫畫; 舞蹈; 恐龍; 狗; 勘探; 童話; 名人; 時尚; 旗子; 花卉; 民間傳說; 食品和飲料; 水果; 地質學; 記錄; 假期; 馬; 土著藝術; 昆蟲; 地標; 文學; 海洋生物; 電影與電視節目; 音樂; 神話; 國家公園; 大自然; 奧運; 宗教; 爬蟲類; 科學; 外太空; 體育; 科技; 劇院; 火車; 交通; 水下生活; 天氣; 野生動物; 世界遺產地; 其他
lt-LT: Pašto ženklo tema: Gyvūnai; Architektūra; Menas; Astronomija; Aviacija; Paukščiai; Drugeliai; Automobiliai; Katės; Šachmatai; Monetos; Komiksai; Šokiai; Dinozaurai; Šunys; Tyrinėjimas; Pasakos; Įžymybės; Madingi; Vėliavos; Gėlės; Folkloras; Maistas ir gėrimai; Vaisiai; Geologija; Istorija; Šventės; Arkliai; Vietinis menas; Vabzdžiai; Žymūs objektai; Literatūra; Jūrų gyvūnija; Filmai ir serialai; Muzika; Mitologija; Nacionaliniai parkai; Gamta; Olimpiada; Religija; Ropliai; Mokslas; Erdvė; Sportas; Technologijos; Teatras; Traukiniai; Viešasis transportas; Povandeninė gyvūnija; Orai; Laukinė gamta; Pasaulio paveldo objektai; Kita
nb: Frimerketema: Dyr; Arkitektur; Kunst; Astronomi; Luftfart; Fugler; Sommerfugler; Biler; Katter; Sjakk; Mynter; Tegneserier; Dans; Dinosaurer; Hunder; Utforskning; Eventyr; Berømte mennesker; Mote; Flagg; Blomster; Folketro; Mat og drikke; Frukt; Geologi; Historie; Helligdager; Hester; Urfolkskunst; Insekter; Landemerker; Litteratur; Sjøliv; Filmer og TV; Musikk; Mytologi; Nasjonalparker; Natur; Olympiske leker; Religion; Reptiler; Vitenskap; Verdensrom; Sport; Teknologi; Teater; Tog; Transport; Undervannsliv; Vær; Dyreliv; Verdensarvsteder; Annen
es: Tema de sellos: Animales; Arquitectura; Arte; Astronomía; Aviación; Aves; Mariposas; Automóviles; Gatos; Ajedrez; Monedas; Cómics; Danza; Dinosaurios; Perros; Exploración; Cuento de hadas; Personajes famosos; Moda; Banderas; Floral; Folklore; Comida y bebidas; Frutas; Geología; Historia; Vacaciones; Caballos; Arte indígena; Insectos; Puntos de referencia; Literatura; Vida marina; Películas y televisión; Música; Mitología; Parques nacionales; Naturaleza; Olimpiadas; Religión; Reptiles; Ciencia; Espacio; Deportes; Tecnología; Teatro; Trenes; Transporte; Vida submarina; Clima; Vida salvaje; Sitios del Patrimonio de la Humanidad; Otros
hu: Bélyegző témája: Állatok; Építészet; Művészet; Csillagászat; Repülés; Madarak; Pillangók; Autók; Macskák; Sakk; Érmék; Képregények; Tánc; Dinoszauruszok; Kutyák; Kutatás; Tündérmese; Híres emberek; Divat; Zászlók; Virágos; Folklór; Ételek és italok; Gyümölcsök; Geológia; Történelem; Ünnepek; Lovak; Őslakos művészet; Rovarok; Tereptárgyak; Irodalom; Tengeri élet; Filmek és TV; Zene; Mitológia; Nemzeti parkok; Természet; Olimpia; Vallás; Hüllők; Tudomány; Tér; Sport; Technológia; Színház; Vonatok; Közlekedés; Víz alatti élet; Időjárás; Vadvilág; Világörökségi helyszínek; Egyéb
de: Stempelthema: Tiere; Architektur; Kunst; Astronomie; Luftfahrt; Vögel; Schmetterlinge; Autos; Katzen; Schach; Münzen; Comics; Tanz; Dinosaurier; Hunde; Erkundung; Märchen; Berühmte Personen; Mode; Flaggen; Blumenmuster; Folklore; Essen und Trinken; Früchte; Geologie; Geschichte; Feiertage; Pferde; Indigene Kunst; Insekten; Sehenswürdigkeiten; Literatur; Meereslebewesen; Filme und Fernsehen; Musik; Mythologie; Nationalparks; Natur; Olympische Spiele; Religion; Reptilien; Wissenschaft; Weltraum; Sportarten; Technologie; Theater; Züge; Transport; Unterwasserleben; Wetter; Tierwelt; Welterbestätten; Sonstiges
vi: Chủ đề tem: Động vật; Kiến trúc; Nghệ thuật; Thiên văn học; Hàng không; Chim; Bướm; Ô tô; Mèo; Cờ vua; Đồng xu; Truyện tranh; Nhảy múa; Khủng long; Chó; Thám hiểm; Truyện thần kỳ; Người nổi danh; Thời trang; Cờ; Hoa cỏ; Văn hóa dân gian; Đồ ăn và đồ uống; Trái cây; Địa chất; Lịch sử; Ngày lễ; Ngựa; Mỹ thuật bản địa; Côn trùng; Công trình mốc; Văn học; Đời sống dưới biển; Phim & Truyền hình; Âm nhạc; Thần thoại; Vườn quốc gia; Thiên nhiên; Olympic; Tôn giáo; Bò sát; Khoa học; Không gian; Thể thao; Công nghệ; Nhà hát; Xe lửa; Vận tải; Đời sống dưới nước; Thời tiết; Động vật hoang dã; Di sản thế giới; Khác
ja: スタンプのテーマ: 動物; 建築物; アート; 天文学; 航空; 鳥; 蝶; 車; ネコ; チェス; コイン; コミック; ダンス; 恐竜; イヌ; 探検; おとぎ話; 著名人; ファッション; フラグ; フローラル; 民間伝承; 食べ物・飲み物; フルーツ; 地質学; 歴史; 休日; ウマ; 土着の芸術; 昆虫; ランドマーク; 文学; 海洋生物; 映画&テレビ; 音楽; 神話; 国立公園; 自然; オリンピック; 宗教; 爬虫類; 科学; 宇宙; スポーツ; テクノロジー; 劇場; 電車; トランスポーテーション; 水中生物; 天気; 野生動物; 世界遺産; その他
tr: Damga teması: Hayvanlar; Mimari; Sanat; Astronomi; Havacılık; Kuşlar; Kelebekler; Arabalar; Kediler; Satranç; Paralar; Çizgi romanlar; Dans; Dinozorlar; Köpekler; Keşif; Masal; Ünlü kişiler; Moda; Bayraklar; Çiçek; Folklor; Yiyecek ve içecekler; Meyveler; Jeoloji; Tarih; Bayramlar; Atlar; Yerli sanatı; Böcekler; Sembol yerler; Edebiyat; Deniz yaşamı; Film ve TV; Müzik; Mitoloji; Ulusal parklar; Doğa; Olimpiyatlar; Dinî; Sürüngenler; Bilim; Uzay; Spor dalları; Teknoloji; Tiyatro; Trenler; Ulaştırma; Sualtı yaşamı; Hava durumu; Yaban hayatı; Dünya miras alanları; Diğer
pl: Motyw stempla: Zwierzęta; Architektura; Sztuka; Astronomia; Lotnictwo; Ptaki; Motyle; Samochody; Koty; Szachy; Monety; Komiksy; Taniec; Dinozaury; Psy; Poszukiwania; Baśń; Sławni ludzie; Moda; Flagi; Kwiatowy; Folklor; Jedzenie i napoje; Owoce; Geologia; Historia; Wakacje; Konie; Sztuka rdzenna; Owady; Zabytki; Literatura; Biologia morza; Filmy i telewizja; Muzyczne; Mitologia; Parki narodowe; Natura; Igrzyska olimpijskie; Religia; Gady; Nauki ścisłe; Powierzchnia; Sport; Technologia; Teatr; Pociągi; Transport; Życie pod wodą; Pogoda; Dzika przyroda; Obiekty światowego dziedzictwa; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 邮票主题: 动物风格; 建筑; 艺术; 天文学; 航空; 鸟类; 蝴蝶; 汽车; 猫; 西洋棋; 硬币; 漫画; 舞蹈; 恐龙; 狗; 探索; 童话; 著名人物; 时尚; 旗帜; 花型; 民俗; 食品和饮料; 水果; 地质; 历史; 节假日; 马匹; 土著艺术; 昆虫; 地标; 文学; 海洋生物; 电影和电视; 音乐; 神话; 国家公园; 自然; 奥运会; 宗教; 爬行动物; 科学; 空间; 体育; 科技; 剧院; 火车; 运输; 水下生物; 天气; 野生动物; 世界遗产; 其他
th: ธีมแสตมป์: สัตว์ต่างๆ; สถาปัตยกรรม; ศิลปะ; ดาราศาสตร์; การบิน; นก; ผีเสื้อ; รถยนต์ต่างๆ; แมว; หมากรุก; เหรียญ; คอมมิก; เต้นรำ; ไดโนเสาร์; สุนัข; การสำรวจ; นิทานปรัมปรา; คนดัง; แฟชั่น; ธง; ลายดอก; นิทานพื้นบ้าน; อาหารกับเครื่องดื่ม; ผลไม้ต่างๆ; ธรณีวิทยา; ประวัติศาสตร์; ช่วงวันหยุด; ม้าต่างๆ; ศิลปะพื้นเมือง; แมลง; แลนด์มาร์ก; วรรณกรรม; สัตว์ทะเล; ภาพยนตร์และทีวี; ดนตรี; ตำนาน; อุทยานแห่งชาติ; ธรรมชาติ; โอลิมปิก; ศาสนา; สัตว์เลื้อยคลาน; วิทศาสตร์; อวกาศ; กีฬาต่างๆ; เทคโนโลยี; โรงละคร; รถไฟ; การขนส่ง; สัตว์ใต้น้ำ; สภาพอากาศ; สัตว์ป่า; แหล่งมรดกโลก; อื่นๆ
it: Tema del timbro: Animali; Architettura; Arte; Astronomia; Aviazione; Uccelli; Farfalle; Automobili; Gatti; Scacchi; Monete; Fumetti; Danza; Dinosauri; Cani; Esplorazione; Fiaba; Vip; Moda; Bandiere; Floreale; Folclore; Cibo e bevande; Frutta; Geologia; Storia; Vacanze; Cavalli; Arte indigena; Insetti; Punti di riferimento; Letteratura; Vita marina; Film e TV; Musica; Mitologia; Parchi nazionali; Natura; Olimpiadi; Religione; Rettili; Scienza; Spazio; Sport; Tecnologia; Teatro; Treni; Trasporti; Vita sottomarina; Tempo; Animali selvatici; Siti del patrimonio mondiale; Altro
ru: Тема марки: Животные; Архитектура; Искусство; Астрономия; Авиация; Птицы; Бабочки; Автомобили; Кошки; Шахматы; Монеты; Комиксы; Танцы; Динозавры; Собаки; Исследование; Сказка; Известные люди; Мода; Флаги; Цветы; Фольклор; Еда и напитки; Фрукты; Геология; История; Праздники; Лошади; Искусство коренных народов; Насекомые; Достопримечательности; Литература; Морская жизнь; Фильмы и ТВ; Музыка; Мифология; Национальные парки; Природа; Олимпиада; Религия; Рептилии; Наука; Космос; Спорт; Технологии; Театр; Поезда; Транспорт; Подводный мир; Погода; Дикая природа; Объекты всемирного наследия; Другое
el: Θέμα σφραγίδας: Ζώα; Αρχιτεκτονική; Τέχνη; Αστρονομία; Αεροπλοΐα; Πουλιά; Πεταλούδες; Αυτοκίνητα; Γάτες; Σκάκι; Νομίσματα; Κόμικς; Χορός; Δεινόσαυροι; Σκύλοι; Εξερεύνηση; Παραμύθι; Διάσημοι άνθρωποι; Μοδάτη; Σημαίες; Φλοράλ; Λαογραφία; Φαγητό και ποτά; Φρούτα; Γεωλογία; Ιστορία; Διακοπές; Άλογα; Αυτόχθονη τέχνη; Έντομα; Ορόσημα; Λογοτεχνία; Θαλάσσια ζωή; Ταινίες και τηλεόραση; Μουσική; Μυθολογία; Εθνικά πάρκα; Φύση; Ολυμπιακοί Αγώνες; Θρησκεία; Ερπετά; Επιστήμη; Διάστημα; Αθλητισμός; Τεχνολογία; Θέατρο; Τρένα; Μεταφοράς; Υποβρύχια ζωή; Καιρός; Αγρια ζωή; Μνημεία παγκόσμιας κληρονομιάς; Άλλο
fr: Thème du tampon: Animaux; Architecture; Art; Astronomie; Aviation; Oiseaux; Papillons; Voitures; Chats; Échecs; Pièces de monnaie; Bandes dessinées; Danse; Dinosaures; Chiens; Exploration; Conte de fées; Personnes célèbres; Mode; Drapeaux; Floral; Folklore; Alimentation et boissons; Fruits; Géologie; Histoire; Vacances; Chevaux; Art indigène; Insectes; Repères; Littérature; Vie marine; Films et télévision; Musique; Mythologie; Parcs nationaux; Nature; Jeux olympiques; Religion; Reptiles; Sciences; Espace; Sports; Technologie; Théâtre; Trains; Transports; Vie sous-marine; Météo; Faune; Sites du patrimoine mondial; Autre
bg-BG: Тема за печат: Животни; Архитектура; Изкуство; Астрономия; Авиация; Птици; Пеперуди; Автомобили; Котки; Шахмат; Монети; Комикси; Танци; Динозаври; Кучета; Проучвания; Приказка; Известни хора; Мода; Знамена; Флорална; Фолклор; Храни и напитки; Плодове; Геология; История; Празници; Коне; Изкуство на коренното население; Насекоми; Забележителности; Литература; Морски живот; Филми и телевизия; Музика; Митология; Национални паркове; Природа; Олимпийски игри; Религия; Влечуги; Наука; Космос; Спорт; Технология; Театър; Влакове; Транспорт; Подводен живот; Времето; Дива природа; Обекти на световното наследство; Други
sl-SI: Tema znamke: Živali; Arhitektura; Umetnost; Astronomija; Letalstvo; Ptice; Metulji; Avtomobili; Mačke; Šah; Kovanci; Stripi; Ples; Dinozavri; Psi; Raziskovanje; Pravljica; Znani ljudje; Moda; Zastave; Cvetlice; Folklora; Hrana in pijača; Sadje; Geologija; Zgodovina; Prazniki; Konji; Avtohtona umetnost; Žuželke; Znamenitosti; Literatura; Morsko življenje; Filmi in TV; Glasba; Mitologija; Nacionalni parki; Narava; Olimpijske igre; Religija; Plazilci; Znanost; Vesolje; Šport; Tehnologija; Gledališče; Vlaki; Prevozništvo; Podvodno življenje; Vreme; Divje živali; Mesta svetovne dediščine; Drugo
pt-PT: Tema de carimbo: Animais; Arquitetura; Arte; Astronomia; Aviação; Pássaros; Borboletas; Carros; Gatos; Xadrez; Moedas; Banda desenhada; Dança; Dinossauros; Cães; Exploração; Conto de fadas; Famosos; Moda; Bandeiras; Floral; Folclore; Bens alimentares e bebidas; Frutas; Geologia; História; Festividades; Cavalos; Arte indígena; Insetos; Monumentos; Literatura; Vida marinha; Filmes e TV; Música; Mitologia; Parques nacionais; Natureza; Jogos Olímpicos; Religião; Répteis; Ciência; Espaço; Desportivo; Tecnologia; Teatro; Comboios; Transportes; Vida subaquática; Condições meteorológicas; Vida selvagem; Património da humanidade; Outro
nl: Thema stempel: Dieren; Architectuur; Kunst; Astronomie; Luchtvaart; Vogels; Vlinders; Auto's; Katten; Schaken; Munten; Strips; Dans; Dinosaurussen; Honden; Verkenning; Sprookje; Beroemde mensen; Mode; Vlaggen; Gebloemd; Folklore; Eten en drinken; Fruit; Geologie; Geschiedenis; Feestdagen; Paarden; Inheemse kunst; Insecten; Bezienswaardigheden; Literatuur; Zeeleven; Films en tv; Muziek; Mythologie; Nationale parken; Natuur; Olympische Spelen; Religie; Reptielen; Wetenschap; Ruimte; Sporten; Technologie; Theater; Treinen; Vervoer; Onderwaterleven; Weer; Wilde dieren; Werelderfgoedsites; Andere
sk-SK: Motív pečiatky: Zvieratá; Architektúra; Umenie; Astronómia; Letectvo; Vtáky; Motýle; Autá; Mačky; Šach; Mince; Komiksy; Tanec; Dinosaury; Psy; Prieskum; Rozprávka; Slávni ľudia; Móda; Vlajky; Kvetinový; Folklór; Jedlo a nápoje; Ovocie; Geológia; História; Prázdniny; Kone; Domorodé umenie; Hmyz; Pamätihodnosti; Literatúra; Morský život; Filmy a televízia; Hudba; Mytológia; Národné parky; Príroda; Olympiády; Náboženstvo; Plazy; Veda; Vesmír; Šport; Technológie; Divadlo; Vlaky; Doprava; Podmorský život; Počasie; Divoká príroda; Miesta svetového dedičstva; Iné
ko: 스탬프 테마: 동물; 건축; 미술; 천문학; 항공; 새; 나비; 자동차; 고양이; 체스; 동전; 만화; 춤; 공룡; 개; 탐구; 동화; 유명인; 패션; 응원기; 꽃; 민속학; 음식 & 음료; 과일; 지질학; 역사; 연휴; 말; 원주민 예술; 곤충; 랜드마크; 문학; 해양 생물; 영화 & TV; 음악; 신화; 국립공원; 자연; 올림픽; 종교; 파충류; 과학; 우주; 스포츠; 기술; 극장; 열차; 교통; 수중 생물; 날씨; 야생동물; 세계 문화 유산; 기타